Georgia statutes. TITLE 39 Minors
CHAPTER 5 Online Internet Safety

Law reviews.

For article, “Revenge Pornography and First Amendment Exceptions,” see 65 Emory L.J. 661 (2016).

For article, “Sex Crimes in the 21st Century:
Human Trafficking, Pornography, and Prostitution the Problems with Pornography Regulation:
Lessons from History,”
see 68 Emory L.J. 867 (2019).

For article, “Sex Crimes in the 21st Century:
Human Trafficking, Pornography, and Prostitution Changing Faces: Morphed Child Pornography Images and the First Amendment,” see 68 Emory L.J. 909 (2019).

For note, “The Four Horsemen of the Internet Apocalypse:
The Revelation of State Net Neutrality Laws,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 977 (2020).

39-5-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Interactive computer service” means any information service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that provides access to the Internet and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational institutions; provided, however, that such term shall not include an entity that provides access to the Internet using wireless service.

“Internet access provider” means an entity that provides consumers with access to the Internet; provided, however, that such term shall not include an entity that provides access to the Internet using wireless service.

“Internet or any other computer network” means the computer network commonly known as the Internet and any other local, regional, or global computer network that is similar to or is a predecessor or successor of the Internet.

“Minor” means a person who is less than 18 years of age.

“Wireless service” shall have the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (3) of Code Section 46-5-221.

History.

Code 1981, §

39-5-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 810, § 2/SB 474; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 39/SB 46.

39-5-2.
Notification to subscribers of products that limit, restrict, or monitor a minor’s use of the Internet.

If an Internet access provider knows or has reason to know from registration data in its possession that a subscriber currently resides within this state, such provider shall make available to the subscriber, in accordance with subsection (c) of this Code section, a product or service that enables the subscriber to control a minor’s use of the Internet, if such product or service is reasonably and commercially available for the technology used by the subscriber to access the Internet.

The product or service shall enable, in a commercially reasonable manner, the subscriber to:

Block a minor’s access to specific websites or domains;

Restrict a minor’s access exclusively to specific websites or domains approved by the subscriber; and

Allow the subscriber to monitor a minor’s use of the Internet service by providing a report to the subscriber of the specific websites or domains that the minor has visited or has attempted to visit but could not access because the websites or domains were blocked or restricted by the subscriber.

If a product or service described in this Code section is reasonably and commercially available for the technology utilized by the subscriber to access the Internet service, the Internet service provider shall:

Provide to the subscriber, at or near the time of subscription, information about the availability of a product or service described in this Code section; or

Make a product or service described in this Code section available to the subscriber either directly or through a third-party vendor and may charge for the product or service.

History.

Code 1981, §

39-5-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 810, § 2/SB 474.

39-5-3.
Immunity for computer service providers.

Telecommunications service providers, wireless service providers, and providers of information services, including, but not limited to Internet service providers and hosting service providers, shall not be liable under this chapter by virtue of the transmission, storage, or caching of electronic communications or messages of others or by virtue of the provision of other related telecommunications or information services used by others in violation of this chapter.

No provider of an interactive computer service shall be liable under this chapter for:

Identifying, removing, disabling, blocking, or otherwise affecting a user based upon a good faith belief that user’s e-mail address, username, or other similar Internet identifier appeared in the National Sex Offender Registry or the state sexual offender registry; or

Failing to identify, block, or otherwise prevent a person from registering for an interactive computer service or failing to remove, disable, or otherwise affect a registered user whose e-mail address, username, or other similar Internet identifier appeared in the National Sex Offender Registry or the state sexual offender registry.

History.

Code 1981, §

39-5-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 810, § 2/SB 474.

39-5-4.
Report of certain information; failure to report required information; penalties.

An interactive computer service doing business in this state that obtains knowledge of facts or circumstances from which a violation of any law of this state prohibiting child pornography is apparent shall make a report, as soon as reasonably possible, of such facts and circumstances to the Cyber Tipline at the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children.

Any interactive computer service that knowingly and willfully violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon a second or subsequent conviction shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

History.

Code 1981, §

39-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 810, § 2/SB 474.